Maine, session 132, LD824.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6030-K is enacted to read:
§6030-K. Pets
1. Pet security deposit. All money paid to a landlord, agent, contractor, designee or
other entity as a condition of keeping a pet within a dwelling unit, other than money paid
for pet rent described in subsection 2, is considered part of the security deposit and must
be refundable to the tenant. As used in this section, "pet" means a dog or cat kept in a
residential dwelling that is not being kept for commercial purposes.
The portion of the security deposit charged for maintaining a pet within a rented dwelling
may not exceed $300.
2. Pet rent. A landlord, agent, contractor, designee or other entity may charge a
monthly fee for pet rent that is separate from the monthly rental charge for a dwelling unit
as long as the fee does not exceed 1% of the monthly rental charge, regardless of the number
of pets that are kept in the dwelling unit.
3. Pet fees prohibited. A landlord, agent, contractor, designee or other entity may not
charge or collect a fee, other than the pet security deposit described in subsection 1 or the
pet rent described in subsection 2, as a condition of keeping a pet within a rented dwelling
unit.
4. Service animals and assistance animals. A landlord, agent, contractor, designee or
other entity may not charge or collect a security deposit, as described in subsection 1, or
pet rent, as described in subsection 2, for a service animal or an assistance animal that is
required by a tenant with a disability as a reasonable accommodation pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 337, the federal Fair Housing Act, 42 United States Code, Section 3604(f)(3)(B),
or any other law.